Maryland, session 2026, SB0193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. sb0193*

SENATE BILL 193
Article – Tax – General
11–247.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “CONSTRUCTION MATERIAL” MEANS AN ITEM OF TANGIBLE
PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS USED TO CONSTRUCT OR RENOVATE A BUILDING, A
STRUCTURE, OR AN IMPROVEMENT ON LAND AND THAT TYPICALLY LOSES ITS
SEPARATE IDENTITY AS PERSONAL PROPERTY ONCE INCORPORATED INTO THE
REAL PROPERTY.
(II) “CONSTRUCTION MATERIAL” INCLUDES BUILDING
MATERIALS, BUILDING SYSTEMS EQUIPMENT, LANDSCAPING MATERIALS, AND
SUPPLIES.
(3) “TARGET REDEVELOPMENT AREA” MEANS REAL PROPERTY IN
WASHINGTON COUNTY THAT:
(I) IS COMMONLY KNOWN AS THE MOUNT AETNA TECHNOLOGY
PARK AND ACCESSIBLE FROM ROBINWOOD DRIVE, MOUNT AETNA ROAD, AND
YALE DRIVE; AND
(II) IS LOCATED IN AN OFFICE, RESEARCH, AND INDUSTRY
ZONING DISTRICT.
(4) “WAREHOUSING EQUIPMENT” MEANS EQUIPMENT USED FOR
MATERIAL HANDLING AND STORAGE, INCLUDING RACKING SYSTEMS, CONVEYING
SYSTEMS, AND COMPUTER SYSTEMS AND EQUIPMENT.
(B) THE SALES AND USE TAX DOES NOT APPLY TO A SALE OF CONSTRUCTION
MATERIAL OR WAREHOUSING EQUIPMENT IF:
(1) THE MATERIAL OR EQUIPMENT IS PURCHASED BY A PERSON
SOLELY FOR USE IN A TARGET REDEVELOPMENT AREA; AND
(2) THE BUYER PROVIDES THE VENDOR WITH EVIDENCE OF
ELIGIBILITY FOR THE EXEMPTION ISSUED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
(C) FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF A SALE DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE BUYER SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF THE

SENATE BILL 193 3
AMOUNT OF SALES AND USE TAX THAT WAS NOT PAID AS A RESULT OF THE
EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH BUYER THAT RECEIVES A CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION SHALL REPORT TO THE COMPTROLLER THE AMOUNT OF SALES
AND USE TAX THAT WAS NOT PAID AS A RESULT OF THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS
SECTION DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF SALES AND USE TAX THAT WAS
NOT PAID AS A RESULT OF THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 10 years and, at the end of June 30, 2036,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.